test/src/morphology/V-arstw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - aŗštõ: # Verb 44 'eng /est arstida/fin' - full paradigm
     aŗštõ+V+Inf: aŗštõ
     aŗštõ+V+Ger: aŗštõs
     aŗštõ+V+Sup: aŗštõm
     aŗštõ+V+Sup+Ine: aŗštõmõs
     aŗštõ+V+Sup+Ela: aŗštõmõst
     aŗštõ+V+Sup+Tra: aŗštõmõks
     aŗštõ+V+Sup+Abe: aŗštõmõt
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āŗštõb
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aŗštõt
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aŗštõbõd
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āŗštiz
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āŗštizt, āŗštiztõ]
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āŗštizt, āŗštiztõ]
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aŗšt
     aŗštõ+V+Cond+Sg3: aŗštõks
     aŗštõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aŗšt
     aŗštõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aŗšt
     aŗštõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aŗštõgid
     aŗštõ+V+Jus+Sg3: aŗštõg
     aŗštõ+V+Quo+Sg3: aŗštiji
     aŗštõ+V+ActPrfPrc: aŗštõn
     aŗštõ+V+PssPrfPrc: aŗštõd
